Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB325.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 141.396 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Authority" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.20-230;
(b) "Qualified investor" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.20-230;
(c) "Qualified small business" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.20-230; and
(d) "Taxpayer" means an individual subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020,
who has either:
1. Received a credit from the authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-236; or
2. Received a credit through a valid transfer allowed under this section
from a qualified investor that was originally awarded the credit.
(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, there is hereby created the
angel investor tax credit. The credit shall be nonrefundable, and shall apply against
the tax imposed by KRS 141.020. The ordering of the credit shall be as provided in
KRS 141.0205.
(3) A qualified investor may seek a credit by applying to the authority pursuant to KRS
154.20-236.
(4) The maximum amount of credit that may be claimed by a taxpayer in any taxable
year shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of credit awarded or
transferred to the taxpayer.
(5) Any amount of credit that a taxpayer is unable to utilize during a taxable year may
be carried forward for use in a succeeding taxable year for a period not to exceed
fifteen (15) years. Any amount of credit not used within fifteen (15) years shall be
lost. No amount of credit may be carried back by any taxpayer.
(6) The credit shall not apply to any liability a taxpayer may have for interest, penalties,
past due taxes, or any other additions to the taxpayer's tax liability. The holder of
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
the credit shall assume any and all liabilities and responsibilities of the credit.
(7) A credit may be transferred by a qualified investor to any individual taxpayer. A
qualified investor making a transfer shall give written notice to the department and
shall provide any other information required by the department, in the manner
prescribed by the department. Any transferred credit shall be subject to the original
timeframes and requirements established by this section and KRS 154.20-230 to
154.20-240 as if held by the qualified investor.
(8) To receive the credit, a taxpayer shall claim the credit on his or her return in the
manner prescribed by the department.
(9) The department shall recapture any portion, or the full amount, of a credit upon
notification from the authority that a recapture is required pursuant to KRS 154.20-
240.
(10) In order for the General Assembly to evaluate the fulfillment of the purposes stated
in KRS 154.20-232, the department and the Cabinet for Economic Development
shall work jointly to submit the following information to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on or before May 1, 2019, and each
May 1 thereafter, related to each taxable year that an angel investor credit is
claimed on a return:
(a) The number of qualified small businesses certified by the authority;
(b) The demographics of each qualified small business, including:
1. The net worth of the qualified small business;
2. The qualified activity the qualified small business is actively and
principally engaged in within the Commonwealth;
3. The number of employees of the qualified small business;
4. The location of the assets and operations[assets, operations, and
employees] of the qualified small business; and
5. The aggregate amount of qualified investments received by the qualified
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
small business;
(c) A list detailing each qualified investor certified by the authority, the amount
of investment made by each qualified investor, the date each qualified
investment is made by the qualified investor, and the amount of tax credit
awarded each investor;
(d) By taxable year, the amount of tax credit claimed by each investor and the
amount of credit available to be claimed in future taxable years;
(e) The number of qualified small businesses that are active, inactive, or closed
that have received qualified investments;
(f) The number of qualified small businesses that have established a location in
the Commonwealth and the number that have expanded operations, the
number and location of each new job created, a description of each
development of new products and technologies in the Commonwealth, and the
field of operation for that growth, including knowledge-based, high-tech, or
research and development; and
(g) The total amount of tax credit awarded for each fiscal year.
(11) If either the department or the Cabinet for Economic Development does not
currently have the data to fulfill the reporting requirement of subsection (10) of this
section, the department and the cabinet shall work jointly to obtain the data in an
expedient manner to provide the report on or before the May 1, 2019, report date.
Section 2. KRS 154.20-234 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The requirements for small businesses, investors, and investments to be qualified
for participation in the Angel Investor Program are as follows:
(a) To be certified as a qualified small business, the business shall demonstrate to
the authority that it is an entity which, at the time the small business requests
certification:
1. Has a net worth of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less or net
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
income after federal income taxes for each of the two (2) preceding
fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less;
2 Is actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the
Commonwealth, or will be actively and principally engaged in a
qualified activity within the Commonwealth after the receipt of a
qualified investment by a qualified investor;
3. Has no more than one hundred (100) full-time employees;
4. Has more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets and operations[assets,
operations, and employees] located in the Commonwealth; and
5. Has at no time received an aggregate amount of qualified investments
that has allowed qualified investors to receive more than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) in angel investor credits;
(b) To be certified as a qualified investor, an individual investor shall demonstrate
to the authority that he or she:
1. Is an individual natural person who may utilize a single-member limited
liability company to make the investment as long as the individual
natural person is the owner and the limited liability company is a
disregarded entity;
2. Qualifies as an accredited investor pursuant to Regulation D of the
United States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. sec.
230.501, in effect as of the date the individual investor requests
certification;
3. Does not hold in excess of twenty percent (20%) ownership interest in,
and is not employed by, the qualified small business prior to making the
qualified investment in that qualified small business;
4. Is not closely related to an individual who holds in excess of twenty
percent (20%) ownership interest in, or who is employed by, the
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
qualified small business prior to making the qualified investment in that
qualified small business. For purposes of this subparagraph, "closely
related" means any of the following in relation to the owner or owners
or spouse of the owner or owners:
a. Parents or grandparents;
b. Children or their spouses; or
c. Siblings or their spouses; and
5. Seeks a financial return from the investment made in the qualified small
business; and
(c) To be certified as a qualified investment, the investment shall:
1. Be a cash investment of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in a
qualified small business by a qualified investor; and
2. Be offered and executed in compliance with applicable state and federal
securities laws and regulations.
(2) In consideration for the qualified investment, the qualified investor shall receive an
equity interest, or a near equity interest, such as a simple agreement for future
equity, or "SAFE agreement", or a convertible debt instrument in the qualified
small business.
(3) The authority may establish additional requirements and guidelines for the efficient
implementation and administration of the Kentucky Angel Investment Act and to
carry out its purposes.
Section 3. KRS 154.20-240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before February 1 of the calendar year succeeding the year in which a credit
was awarded, and continuing for four (4) years thereafter, a qualified small business
that has received a qualified investment shall file an annual report with the
authority.
(2) (a) This report shall demonstrate that the small business:
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
1. Continues to have more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets and
operations[assets, operations, and employees] in the Commonwealth;
2. Has at no time received an aggregate amount of qualified investments
that has allowed qualified investors to receive more than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) in credits; and
3. Continues to be actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity.
(b) The report shall also provide additional information related to the success of
the small business attributable to the investment, including but not limited to:
1. New jobs created;
2. Increased sales or other economic activity conducted;
3. The degree of other private investment attracted; and
4. Any other information requested by the authority.
(3) If a qualified small business either:
(a) Fails to submit the report mandated by this section in any year; or
(b) Fails to meet any of the criteria listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section at
any time during any year of the reporting period;
the authority shall notify the department, which shall recapture any portion, or the
full amount, of the credit awarded for qualified investments in that qualified small
business from the qualified investor that received the credit award or any taxpayer
receiving the credit through a valid transfer. Any amounts collected from the
recapture shall be deposited in the general fund.
(4) If a qualified small business becomes insolvent and ceases operations at any time
before the final required annual report is due, it shall file a written report with the
authority attesting to that fact and shall thereafter be exempt from the annual report
required by this section, and credits awarded and already claimed for qualified
investments in that qualified small business shall not be subject to any recapture.
Any credits not claimed as of the date the company became insolvent and ceased
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
operations shall be considered expired and shall not be claimed.
Section 4. KRS 154.20-254 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Affiliate" means any person or entity who directly or indirectly, through one (1) or
more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by or is under common control with
another person or entity;
(2) "Agreement" means an investment fund agreement entered into pursuant to KRS
154.20-255(5) by the authority and an investment fund manager on behalf of the
investment fund, the investment fund manager, and any investor in the investment
fund;
(3) "Amended application" means a document submitted by an investment fund
manager, in a form acceptable to the authority and on behalf of an investment fund,
for the purpose of increasing the aggregate amount of available tax credits;
(4) "Applicant" means any person or entity who has not received approval from the
authority as an investment fund manager, but who has submitted or will submit an
application to the authority for approval as an investment fund manager;
(5) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority or its
designee;
(6) "Cash contribution" means an investment of money by an investor in an investment
fund under the terms of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284;
(7) "Committed cash contribution" means a legally binding agreement by an investor to
make a cash contribution in an amount set forth in a written agreement between an
investor and an investment fund;
(8) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(9) "Credit" means a nonrefundable credit for investors against state tax liability
allocated and granted by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-258 for qualified
investments made by approved investment funds;
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
(10) "Entity" means any corporation, limited liability company, business development
corporation, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, association, joint
stock company, receivership, trust, professional service organization, or other legal
entity through which business is conducted;
(11) "Financial institution" means "financial institution" as defined in KRS 136.500(10)
and includes savings and loan associations, savings banks, and similar institutions
subject to the taxes imposed by KRS 136.290, 136.300, or 136.310;
(12) "Insurance company" means any insurance company subject to the taxes imposed
by KRS 136.320, 136.330, or 304.3-270;
(13) "Investment fund" means any entity that is organized by an investment fund
manager in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and
regulations, and is approved by the authority to make qualified investments
pursuant to KRS 154.20-256;
(14) "Investment fund manager" means any person or entity that has been approved by
the authority to manage one (1) or more investment funds authorized under the
provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and is in compliance with all
applicable federal and state regulations;
(15) "Investor" means any person or entity, including financial institutions and insurance
companies, that is subject to state tax liability and that makes a cash contribution or
a committed cash contribution to an investment fund in accordance with the
provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and has not been convicted of
violating any of Kentucky's tax laws within the past ten (10) years;
(16) "Knowledge-based" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011;
(17) "Nonprofit entity" means an investor that is exempt from federal income tax under
Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(18) "Qualified activity" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.20-230;
(19) "Qualified investment" means an investment of at least ten thousand dollars
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1727
($10,000) in a small business by an investment fund, in compliance with applicable
state and federal securities laws and regulations, seeking a financial return based
upon that consideration. In consideration for the qualified investment, the
investment fund shall receive an equity interest in the small business, such as a
general or limited partnership interest, common or preferred stock with or without
voting rights and without regard to seniority position, forms of subordinate or
convertible unsecured debt, or both, with warrants, rights, or other means of equity
conversion attached; and
(20) "Small business" means any entity which at the time a qualified investment is made
by an investment fund:
(a) 1. Has a net worth of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less or net
income after federal income taxes for each of the two (2) preceding
fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less; or
2. Is a knowledge-based business, as shall be prescribed by the
commissioner of the Department of Commercialization and Innovation,
and has a net worth of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less;
(b) Is actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the
Commonwealth, or will be actively and principally engaged in a qualified
activity within the Commonwealth after the receipt of a qualified investment
by an investment fund;
(c) Has no more than one hundred (100) employees; and
(d) Has more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets and operations[assets,
operations, and employees] located in Kentucky.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed